Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1917
Appeal; substitute for undertaking.

Instead of the undertaking prescribed in subdivision (2) of section 25-1916, the conveyance or other instrument may be executed and deposited with the clerk of the court in which the judgment was rendered or order made, to abide the judgment of the appellate court.

R.S.1867, Code § 589, p. 498;

R.S.1913, § 8190;

C.S.1922, § 9142;

C.S.1929, § 20-1917;

R.S.1943, § 25-1917;

Laws 1994, LB 899, § 2.

Deposit of order approving consolidation of school districts was not a substitute for supersedeas bond. School Dist. No. 65 of Perkins County v. McQuiston, 163 Neb. 246, 79 N.W.2d 413 (1956).

Where decree of trial court requires execution of a conveyance the appellant may, in lieu of bond, execute the required conveyance and deposit it with the clerk to abide the judgment of the appellate court. Walter v. Gillan, 129 Neb. 514, 262 N.W. 33 (1935).